third_party/liblouis/src/tables/ko-g2.ctb
always 자윽 46-126-246-1
always 자윾 46-126-246-1-1
always 자윿 46-126-246-1-3
always 자은 46-126-1356
always 자읁 46-126-1356-13
always 자읂 46-126-1356-356
always 자읃 46-126-246-35
always 자을 46-126-2346
always 자읅 46-126-2346-1
always 자읆 46-126-2346-26
always 자읇 46-126-2346-12
always 자읈 46-126-2346-3
always 자읉 46-126-2346-236
always 자읊 46-126-2346-256
always 자읋 46-126-2346-356
always 자음 46-126-246-26
always 자읍 46-126-246-12
always 자읎 46-126-246-12-3
always 자읏 46-126-246-3
always 자읐 46-126-246-34
always 자응 46-126-246-2356
always 자읒 46-126-246-13
always 자읓 46-126-246-23
always 자읔 46-126-246-235
always 자읕 46-126-246-236
always 자읖 46-126-246-256
always 자읗 46-126-246-356
always 자의 46-126-2456
always 자읙 46-126-2456-1
always 자읚 46-126-2456-1-1
always 자읛 46-126-2456-1-3
always 자읜 46-126-2456-25
always 자읝 46-126-2456-25-13
always 자읞 46-126-2456-25-356
always 자읟 46-126-2456-35
always 자읠 46-126-2456-2
always 자읡 46-126-2456-2-1
always 자읢 46-126-2456-2-26
always 자읣 46-126-2456-2-12
always 자읤 46-126-2456-2-3
always 자읥 46-126-2456-2-236
always 자읦 46-126-2456-2-256
always 자읧 46-126-2456-2-356
always 자읨 46-126-2456-26
always 자읩 46-126-2456-12
always 자읪 46-126-2456-12-3
always 자읫 46-126-2456-3
always 자읬 46-126-2456-34
always 자읭 46-126-2456-2356
always 자읮 46-126-2456-13
always 자읯 46-126-2456-23
always 자읰 46-126-2456-235
always 자읱 46-126-2456-236
always 자읲 46-126-2456-256
always 자읳 46-126-2456-356
always 자이 46-126-135
always 자익 46-126-135-1
always 자읶 46-126-135-1-1
always 자읷 46-126-135-1-3
always 자인 46-126-12345
always 자읹 46-126-12345-13
always 자읺 46-126-12345-356
always 자읻 46-126-135-35
always 자일 46-126-135-2
always 자읽 46-126-135-2-1
always 자읾 46-126-135-2-26
always 자읿 46-126-135-2-12
always 자잀 46-126-135-2-3
always 자잁 46-126-135-2-236
always 자잂 46-126-135-2-256
always 자잃 46-126-135-2-356
always 자임 46-126-135-26
always 자입 46-126-135-12
always 자잆 46-126-135-12-3
always 자잇 46-126-135-3
always 자있 46-126-135-34
always 자잉 46-126-135-2356
always 자잊 46-126-135-13
always 자잋 46-126-135-23
always 자잌 46-126-135-235
always 자잍 46-126-135-236
always 자잎 46-126-135-256
always 자잏 46-126-135-356
always 짜아 6-46-126-126
always 짜악 6-46-126-126-1
always 짜앆 6-46-126-126-1-1
always 짜앇 6-46-126-126-1-3
always 짜안 6-46-126-126-25
always 짜앉 6-46-126-126-25-13
always 짜않 6-46-126-126-25-356
always 짜앋 6-46-126-126-35
always 짜알 6-46-126-126-2
always 짜앍 6-46-126-126-2-1
always 짜앎 6-46-126-126-2-26
always 짜앏 6-46-126-126-2-12
always 짜앐 6-46-126-126-2-3
always 짜앑 6-46-126-126-2-236
always 짜앒 6-46-126-126-2-256
always 짜앓 6-46-126-126-2-356
always 짜암 6-46-126-126-26
always 짜압 6-46-126-126-12
always 짜앖 6-46-126-126-12-3
always 짜앗 6-46-126-126-3
always 짜았 6-46-126-126-34
always 짜앙 6-46-126-126-2356
always 짜앚 6-46-126-126-13
always 짜앛 6-46-126-126-23
always 짜앜 6-46-126-126-235
always 짜앝 6-46-126-126-236
always 짜앞 6-46-126-126-256
always 짜앟 6-46-126-126-356
always 짜애 6-46-126-1235
always 짜액 6-46-126-1235-1
always 짜앢 6-46-126-1235-1-1
always 짜앣 6-46-126-1235-1-3
always 짜앤 6-46-126-1235-25
always 짜앥 6-46-126-1235-25-13
always 짜앦 6-46-126-1235-25-356
always 짜앧 6-46-126-1235-35
always 짜앨 6-46-126-1235-2
always 짜앩 6-46-126-1235-2-1
always 짜앪 6-46-126-1235-2-26
always 짜앫 6-46-126-1235-2-12
always 짜앬 6-46-126-1235-2-3
always 짜앭 6-46-126-1235-2-236
always 짜앮 6-46-126-1235-2-256
always 짜앯 6-46-126-1235-2-356
always 짜앰 6-46-126-1235-26
always 짜앱 6-46-126-1235-12
always 짜앲 6-46-126-1235-12-3
always 짜앳 6-46-126-1235-3
always 짜앴 6-46-126-1235-34
always 짜앵 6-46-126-1235-2356
always 짜앶 6-46-126-1235-13
always 짜앷 6-46-126-1235-23
always 짜앸 6-46-126-1235-235
always 짜앹 6-46-126-1235-236
always 짜앺 6-46-126-1235-256
always 짜앻 6-46-126-1235-356
always 짜야 6-46-126-345
always 짜약 6-46-126-345-1
always 짜앾 6-46-126-345-1-1
always 짜앿 6-46-126-345-1-3
always 짜얀 6-46-126-345-25
always 짜얁 6-46-126-345-25-13
always 짜얂 6-46-126-345-25-356
always 짜얃 6-46-126-345-35
always 짜얄 6-46-126-345-2
always 짜얅 6-46-126-345-2-1
always 짜얆 6-46-126-345-2-26
always 짜얇 6-46-126-345-2-12
always 짜얈 6-46-126-345-2-3
always 짜얉 6-46-126-345-2-236
always 짜얊 6-46-126-345-2-256
always 짜얋 6-46-126-345-2-356
always 짜얌 6-46-126-345-26
always 짜얍 6-46-126-345-12
always 짜얎 6-46-126-345-12-3
always 짜얏 6-46-126-345-3
always 짜얐 6-46-126-345-34
always 짜양 6-46-126-345-2356
always 짜얒 6-46-126-345-13
always 짜얓 6-46-126-345-23
always 짜얔 6-46-126-345-235
always 짜얕 6-46-126-345-236
always 짜얖 6-46-126-345-256
always 짜얗 6-46-126-345-356
always 짜얘 6-46-126-345-1235
always 짜얙 6-46-126-345-1235-1
always 짜얚 6-46-126-345-1235-1-1
always 짜얛 6-46-126-345-1235-1-3
always 짜얜 6-46-126-345-1235-25
always 짜얝 6-46-126-345-1235-25-13
always 짜얞 6-46-126-345-1235-25-356
always 짜얟 6-46-126-345-1235-35
always 짜얠 6-46-126-345-1235-2
always 짜얡 6-46-126-345-1235-2-1
always 짜얢 6-46-126-345-1235-2-26
always 짜얣 6-46-126-345-1235-2-12
always 짜얤 6-46-126-345-1235-2-3
always 짜얥 6-46-126-345-1235-2-236
always 짜얦 6-46-126-345-1235-2-256
always 짜얧 6-46-126-345-1235-2-356
always 짜얨 6-46-126-345-1235-26
always 짜얩 6-46-126-345-1235-12
always 짜얪 6-46-126-345-1235-12-3
always 짜얫 6-46-126-345-1235-3
always 짜얬 6-46-126-345-1235-34
always 짜얭 6-46-126-345-1235-2356
always 짜얮 6-46-126-345-1235-13
always 짜얯 6-46-126-345-1235-23
always 짜얰 6-46-126-345-1235-235
always 짜얱 6-46-126-345-1235-236
always 짜얲 6-46-126-345-1235-256
always 짜얳 6-46-126-345-1235-356
always 짜어 6-46-126-234
always 짜억 6-46-126-1456
always 짜얶 6-46-126-1456-1
always 짜얷 6-46-126-1456-3
always 짜언 6-46-126-23456
always 짜얹 6-46-126-23456-13
always 짜얺 6-46-126-23456-356
always 짜얻 6-46-126-234-35
always 짜얼 6-46-126-2345
always 짜얽 6-46-126-2345-1
always 짜얾 6-46-126-2345-26
always 짜얿 6-46-126-2345-12
always 짜엀 6-46-126-2345-3
always 짜엁 6-46-126-2345-236
always 짜엂 6-46-126-2345-256
always 짜엃 6-46-126-2345-356
always 짜엄 6-46-126-234-26
always 짜업 6-46-126-234-12
always 짜없 6-46-126-234-12-3
always 짜엇 6-46-126-234-3
always 짜었 6-46-126-234-34
always 짜엉 6-46-126-234-2356
always 짜엊 6-46-126-234-13
always 짜엋 6-46-126-234-23
always 짜엌 6-46-126-234-235
always 짜엍 6-46-126-234-236
always 짜엎 6-46-126-234-256
always 짜엏 6-46-126-234-356
always 짜에 6-46-126-1345
always 짜엑 6-46-126-1345-1
always 짜엒 6-46-126-1345-1-1
always 짜엓 6-46-126-1345-1-3
always 짜엔 6-46-126-1345-25
always 짜엕 6-46-126-1345-25-13
always 짜엖 6-46-126-1345-25-356
always 짜엗 6-46-126-1345-35
always 짜엘 6-46-126-1345-2
always 짜엙 6-46-126-1345-2-1
always 짜엚 6-46-126-1345-2-26
always 짜엛 6-46-126-1345-2-12
always 짜엜 6-46-126-1345-2-3
always 짜엝 6-46-126-1345-2-236
always 짜엞 6-46-126-1345-2-256
always 짜엟 6-46-126-1345-2-356
always 짜엠 6-46-126-1345-26
always 짜엡 6-46-126-1345-12
always 짜엢 6-46-126-1345-12-3
always 짜엣 6-46-126-1345-3
always 짜엤 6-46-126-1345-34
always 짜엥 6-46-126-1345-2356
always 짜엦 6-46-126-1345-13
always 짜엧 6-46-126-1345-23
always 짜엨 6-46-126-1345-235
always 짜엩 6-46-126-1345-236
always 짜엪 6-46-126-1345-256
always 짜엫 6-46-126-1345-356
always 짜여 6-46-126-156
always 짜역 6-46-126-156-1
always 짜엮 6-46-126-156-1-1
always 짜엯 6-46-126-156-1-3
always 짜연 6-46-126-16
always 짜엱 6-46-126-16-13
always 짜엲 6-46-126-16-356
always 짜열 6-46-126-1256
always 짜엵 6-46-126-1256-1
always 짜엶 6-46-126-1256-26
always 짜엷 6-46-126-1256-12
always 짜엸 6-46-126-1256-3
always 짜엹 6-46-126-1256-236
always 짜엺 6-46-126-1256-256
always 짜엻 6-46-126-1256-356
always 짜염 6-46-126-156-26
always 짜엽 6-46-126-156-12
always 짜엾 6-46-126-156-12-3
always 짜엿 6-46-126-156-3
always 짜였 6-46-126-156-34
always 짜영 6-46-126-12456
always 짜옂 6-46-126-156-13
always 짜옃 6-46-126-156-23
always 짜옄 6-46-126-156-235
always 짜옅 6-46-126-156-236
always 짜옆 6-46-126-156-256
always 짜옇 6-46-126-156-356
always 짜예 6-46-126-34
always 짜옉 6-46-126-34-1
always 짜옊 6-46-126-34-1-1
always 짜옋 6-46-126-34-1-3
always 짜옌 6-46-126-34-25
always 짜옍 6-46-126-34-25-13
always 짜옎 6-46-126-34-25-356
always 짜옏 6-46-126-34-35
always 짜옐 6-46-126-34-2
always 짜옑 6-46-126-34-2-1
always 짜옒 6-46-126-34-2-26
always 짜옓 6-46-126-34-2-12
always 짜옔 6-46-126-34-2-3
always 짜옕 6-46-126-34-2-236
always 짜옖 6-46-126-34-2-256
always 짜옗 6-46-126-34-2-356
always 짜옘 6-46-126-34-26
always 짜옙 6-46-126-34-12
always 짜옚 6-46-126-34-12-3
always 짜옛 6-46-126-34-3
always 짜옜 6-46-126-34-34
always 짜옝 6-46-126-34-2356
always 짜옞 6-46-126-34-13
always 짜옟 6-46-126-34-23
always 짜옠 6-46-126-34-235
always 짜옡 6-46-126-34-236
always 짜옢 6-46-126-34-256
always 짜옣 6-46-126-34-356
always 짜오 6-46-126-136
always 짜옥 6-46-126-1346
always 짜옦 6-46-126-1346-1
always 짜옧 6-46-126-1346-3
always 짜온 6-46-126-12356
always 짜옩 6-46-126-12356-13
always 짜옪 6-46-126-12356-356
always 짜옫 6-46-126-136-35
always 짜올 6-46-126-136-2
always 짜옭 6-46-126-136-2-1
always 짜옮 6-46-126-136-2-26
always 짜옯 6-46-126-136-2-12
always 짜옰 6-46-126-136-2-3
always 짜옱 6-46-126-136-2-236
always 짜옲 6-46-126-136-2-256
always 짜옳 6-46-126-136-2-356
always 짜옴 6-46-126-136-26
always 짜옵 6-46-126-136-12
always 짜옶 6-46-126-136-12-3
always 짜옷 6-46-126-136-3
always 짜옸 6-46-126-136-34
always 짜옹 6-46-126-123456
always 짜옺 6-46-126-136-13
always 짜옻 6-46-126-136-23
always 짜옼 6-46-126-136-235
always 짜옽 6-46-126-136-236
always 짜옾 6-46-126-136-256
always 짜옿 6-46-126-136-356
always 짜와 6-46-126-1236
always 짜왁 6-46-126-1236-1
always 짜왂 6-46-126-1236-1-1
always 짜왃 6-46-126-1236-1-3
always 짜완 6-46-126-1236-25
always 짜왅 6-46-126-1236-25-13
always 짜왆 6-46-126-1236-25-356
always 짜왇 6-46-126-1236-35
always 짜왈 6-46-126-1236-2
always 짜왉 6-46-126-1236-2-1
always 짜왊 6-46-126-1236-2-26
always 짜왋 6-46-126-1236-2-12
always 짜왌 6-46-126-1236-2-3
always 짜왍 6-46-126-1236-2-236
always 짜왎 6-46-126-1236-2-256
always 짜왏 6-46-126-1236-2-356
always 짜왐 6-46-126-1236-26
always 짜왑 6-46-126-1236-12
always 짜왒 6-46-126-1236-12-3
always 짜왓 6-46-126-1236-3
always 짜왔 6-46-126-1236-34
always 짜왕 6-46-126-1236-2356
always 짜왖 6-46-126-1236-13
always 짜왗 6-46-126-1236-23
always 짜왘 6-46-126-1236-235
always 짜왙 6-46-126-1236-236
always 짜왚 6-46-126-1236-256
always 짜왛 6-46-126-1236-356
always 짜왜 6-46-126-1236-1235
always 짜왝 6-46-126-1236-1235-1
always 짜왞 6-46-126-1236-1235-1-1
always 짜왟 6-46-126-1236-1235-1-3
always 짜왠 6-46-126-1236-1235-25
always 짜왡 6-46-126-1236-1235-25-13
always 짜왢 6-46-126-1236-1235-25-356
always 짜왣 6-46-126-1236-1235-35
always 짜왤 6-46-126-1236-1235-2
always 짜왥 6-46-126-1236-1235-2-1
always 짜왦 6-46-126-1236-1235-2-26
always 짜왧 6-46-126-1236-1235-2-12
always 짜왨 6-46-126-1236-1235-2-3
always 짜왩 6-46-126-1236-1235-2-236
always 짜왪 6-46-126-1236-1235-2-256
always 짜왫 6-46-126-1236-1235-2-356
always 짜왬 6-46-126-1236-1235-26
always 짜왭 6-46-126-1236-1235-12
always 짜왮 6-46-126-1236-1235-12-3
always 짜왯 6-46-126-1236-1235-3
always 짜왰 6-46-126-1236-1235-34
always 짜왱 6-46-126-1236-1235-2356
always 짜왲 6-46-126-1236-1235-13
always 짜왳 6-46-126-1236-1235-23
always 짜왴 6-46-126-1236-1235-235
always 짜왵 6-46-126-1236-1235-236
always 짜왶 6-46-126-1236-1235-256
always 짜왷 6-46-126-1236-1235-356
always 짜외 6-46-126-13456
always 짜왹 6-46-126-13456-1
always 짜왺 6-46-126-13456-1-1
always 짜왻 6-46-126-13456-1-3
always 짜왼 6-46-126-13456-25
always 짜왽 6-46-126-13456-25-13
always 짜왾 6-46-126-13456-25-356
always 짜왿 6-46-126-13456-35
always 짜욀 6-46-126-13456-2
always 짜욁 6-46-126-13456-2-1
always 짜욂 6-46-126-13456-2-26
always 짜욃 6-46-126-13456-2-12
always 짜욄 6-46-126-13456-2-3
always 짜욅 6-46-126-13456-2-236
always 짜욆 6-46-126-13456-2-256
always 짜욇 6-46-126-13456-2-356
always 짜욈 6-46-126-13456-26
always 짜욉 6-46-126-13456-12
always 짜욊 6-46-126-13456-12-3
always 짜욋 6-46-126-13456-3
always 짜욌 6-46-126-13456-34
always 짜욍 6-46-126-13456-2356
always 짜욎 6-46-126-13456-13
always 짜욏 6-46-126-13456-23
always 짜욐 6-46-126-13456-235
always 짜욑 6-46-126-13456-236
always 짜욒 6-46-126-13456-256
always 짜욓 6-46-126-13456-356
always 짜요 6-46-126-346
always 짜욕 6-46-126-346-1
always 짜욖 6-46-126-346-1-1
always 짜욗 6-46-126-346-1-3
always 짜욘 6-46-126-346-25
always 짜욙 6-46-126-346-25-13
always 짜욚 6-46-126-346-25-356
always 짜욛 6-46-126-346-35
always 짜욜 6-46-126-346-2
always 짜욝 6-46-126-346-2-1
always 짜욞 6-46-126-346-2-26
always 짜욟 6-46-126-346-2-12
always 짜욠 6-46-126-346-2-3
always 짜욡 6-46-126-346-2-236
always 짜욢 6-46-126-346-2-256
always 짜욣 6-46-126-346-2-356
always 짜욤 6-46-126-346-26
always 짜욥 6-46-126-346-12
always 짜욦 6-46-126-346-12-3
